Washington statutes.
RCW 5.50.020

Applicability.

This chapter applies to an unsworn declaration by a declarant who at the time of making the declaration is physically located within or outside the boundaries of the United States, whether or not the location is subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

[ 2019 c 232 s 2; 2011 c 22 s 3.]